District of Columbia statutes.
15-314

Appraisement; notice of sale.

Where not herein otherwise provided, all property levied upon, except money, shall be appraised by two sworn appraisers and sold at public auction for cash.

Personal property may be sold after ten days’ notice by advertisement, containing a description sufficiently definite to be embodied in a conveyance of title.

Leasehold and freehold estates in land may be sold after notice has been made in the manner provided by section 2002 of Title 28, United States Code .

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 15-314.
1981 Ed., § 15-314.